Utah statutes.
63M-1-910.   Annual policy considerations.

(1)  The board shall determine annually which industries or groups of industries shall be targeted industries as defined in Section 63M-1-902.

(2)  In designating an economically disadvantaged rural area, the board shall consider the average agricultural and nonagricultural wage, personal income, unemployment, and employment in the area.

(3)  In evaluating the economic impact of applications for assistance, the board shall use an econometric cost-benefit model or models adopted by the Governor's Office of Management and Budget.

(4)  The board may establish:

(a)  minimum interest rates to be applied to loans granted that reflect a fair social rate of return to the state comparable to prevailing market-based rates such as the prime rate, U.S. Government T-bill rate, or bond coupon rate as paid by the state, adjusted by social indicators such as the rate of unemployment; and

(b)  minimum applicant expense ratios, as long as they are at least equal to those required under Subsection 63M-1-906(1)(a) or 63M-1-908(1)(b)(i)(A).



Amended by Chapter 310, 2013 General Session

